Hawaii statutes.
§663J-6 Joinder of parties. (a) In
the discretion of the court, two or more individuals may join in one action
under this chapter as plaintiffs if their respective actions involve a person
who engages in promoting prostitution by coercion or subjecting the individuals
to sex trafficking.

(b) In the discretion of the court, two or
more persons may be joined in one action under this chapter as defendants if
those persons may be liable to at least one plaintiff. [L 1999, c 203, pt of §2;
am L 2016, c 206, §7]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next